New Jersey, session 222, A131.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Bleeding control kit means a first aid response kit that contains the necessary items to control severe bleeding and prevent further blood loss for an individual suffering a traumatic injury. Chest seal mean a bandage used for a deep puncture wound to the chest, neck, or abdomen. Commissioner means the Commissioner of Health. State building means a building or portion of a building that is owned, leased, or operated by a State agency. b.    (1) The Commissioner of Health shall establish and issue guidelines no later than the 180th day after the effective date of this section, which the commissioner shall recommend for adoption by all State agencies, with respect to the placement of bleeding control kits in State buildings. (2)  The guidelines established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section shall, at a minimum, require: (i)   each bleeding control kit to contain the following items in such quantities as determined appropriate by the commissioner:  a tourniquet approved by the Department of Health; a chest seal; compression bandages; bleeding control bandages; a space emergency blanket; latex-free gloves; markers; scissors; an instructional document approved by the Department of Health detailing methods to prevent blood loss following a traumatic event; and other items deemed necessary by the commissioner; (ii)  the bleeding control kit to be replaced after each use; and (iii) the bleeding control kit to be placed in a readily accessible location that is within a reasonable proximity, as determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Health, from any automated external defibrillator placed in the State building under guidelines established by the commissioner pursuant section 2 of P.L.2001, c.375 (C.2A:62A-29). 2.    a.  As used in this section: Bleeding control kit means a first aid response kit that contains the necessary items to control severe bleeding and prevent further blood loss for an individual suffering a traumatic injury. Chest seal mean a bandage used for a deep puncture wound to the chest, neck, or abdomen. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no later than the following school year, or 180 days after the effective date of this section, whichever is later, the board of education of a public school district and the governing board or chief school administrator of a nonpublic school that includes any of the grades kindergarten through 12 shall ensure that each public or nonpublic school has a bleeding control kit which is made available in an unlocked location on school property with an appropriate identifying sign.  The kit shall be within a reasonable proximity, as determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Health, from the automated external defibrillator required to be in the school pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2012, c.51 (C.18A:40-41a) and within reasonable proximity of the school athletic field or gymnasium, as applicable.  The kit shall be accessible during the school day and any other time when a school-sponsored athletic event or team practice is taking place in which pupils of the district or nonpublic school are participating. c.    A bleeding control kit acquired pursuant to subsection b. of this section shall: (1)  contain the following items in such quantities as determined appropriate by the Commissioner of Health:  a tourniquet approved by the Department of Health; a chest seal; compression bandages; bleeding control bandages; a space emergency blanket; latex-free gloves; markers; scissors; an instructional document approved by the Department of Health detailing methods to prevent blood loss following a traumatic event; and other items deemed necessary by the commissioner; and (2)  be replaced after each use. 3.    The Commissioner of Health, in conjunction with the Commissioner of Education for the purpose of section 2 of this act, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.